Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-502.01
Sexually transmitted diseases; enumerated.

Sexually transmitted diseases are declared to be contagious, infectious, communicable, and dangerous to the public health. Sexually transmitted diseases shall include, but not be limited to, syphilis, gonorrhea, chancroid, and such other sexually transmitted diseases as the Department of Health and Human Services may from time to time specify.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. XVII, § 1, p. 802;

C.S.1922, § 8298;

C.S.1929, § 71-2901;

R.S.1943, § 71-1101;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-1101;

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 489;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 377.